Florida, session 2026, HB253.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 295.157, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
295.157 Veterans Dental Care Grant Program.—
(3) The Veterans Dental Care Grant Program is established
within the Department of Veterans' Affairs. The purpose of the
program is to provide oral health care to veterans who reside in
this state and who have incomes of up to 400 percent of the
federal poverty level.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb253 -01-er